Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1315
Department; utilize federal funds; matching funds; how paid.

The department shall utilize any federal funds available in the construction of railroad grade crossing protection devices or other safety improvements. If funds are needed to match any federal funds the political subdivision in which the crossing is located shall contribute half of the matching funds needed but shall not be required to provide more than five percent of the total cost. If it is determined by the department that a railroad crossing safety project involving federal funds will result in ascertainable benefits to the railroad such railroad may be required to provide up to five percent of the total cost of the project. The balance of any matching funds needed shall be paid by the department from the Grade Crossing Protection Fund.

Laws 1979, LB 42, § 6.